src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
LEXICON Initials
@P.infl.NONTERM@(a)cikâs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cikâs I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(a)yâkwâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@yâkwâm I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@(i)towihk:@P.infl.IPC@towihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ka)kwatak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@kwatak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ka)kwayâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@kwayâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ka)kwâtak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@kwâtak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ka)kwêt-:@P.infl.NONTERM@kwêt I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ki)sîpêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@sîpêk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(na)ma:@P.infl.NONTERM@ma I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@(na)mwât:@P.infl.IPC@mwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(na)nam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@nam I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@(o)mikî-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mikî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(o)tâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@tâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@(pâ)mwayês:@P.infl.IPC@mwayês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(â)cik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cik I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@(ô)how-:@P.infl.NA-2@how I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@(ý)îw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@îw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@[kwîhkwî-]:@P.infl.NONTERM@kwîhkwî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@[mâ(h)-]:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@acikâsi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@acikâsi I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@acit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@acit I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@aciwasw-:@P.infl.VTA-3@aciwasw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@aciýaw:@P.infl.IPC@aciýaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ah I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@ah-:@P.infl.VTA-1@ah I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-5@ah-:@P.infl.VTA-5@ah I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@ah-:@P.infl.VTI-1@ah I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@ahcahkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@ahcahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcâp(y)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcâp I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@ahcâpiy-:@P.infl.NI-2@ahcâpiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcâpiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahcâpiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkamik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkamik I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkwêhtaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkwêhtaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@ahpiht-:@P.infl.NA-1@ahpiht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpiht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpiht I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@ahpin-:@P.infl.NI-1@ahpin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpîht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpîht I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@ahpô:@P.infl.IPC@ahpô I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpô:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpô I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aht I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@ahtay-:@P.infl.NA-2@ahtay I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@ahtay-:@P.infl.NI-2@ahtay I2M ;
@P.infl.IPJ@ahâw:@P.infl.IPJ@ahâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ak(â)wât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@ak-:@P.infl.IPC@ak I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ak I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@akahkway-:@P.infl.NA-2@akahkway I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akahkway-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akahkway I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@akaskw-:@P.infl.NA-3@akaskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@akikw-:@P.infl.NA-3@akikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akim I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@akim-:@P.infl.VTA-1@akim I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê(w)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê(wê)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@akinê-:@P.infl.IPC@akinê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akinê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akoT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akoT I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@akoT-:@P.infl.VTA-4@akoT I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@akohp-:@P.infl.IPC@akohp I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@akohp-:@P.infl.NA-1@akohp I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@akohp-:@P.infl.NI-1@akohp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akohp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akohp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akoht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akoht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akokw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akokw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akosk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akosk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akosî-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akosî I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@akosî-:@P.infl.VAI-v@akosî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwahon-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwahon I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwanâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwanâ I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@akwanân-:@P.infl.VAI-v@akwanân I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@akwaskw-:@P.infl.NA-3@akwaskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâ(si)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akwâw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@akâm-:@P.infl.IPC@akâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@akâwâ(t)-:@P.infl.IPC@akâwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akâwât:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâwât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@akâwât-:@P.infl.IPC@akâwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@akâwât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâwât I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@amiskw-:@P.infl.NA-3@amiskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@amiskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@amiskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@an-:@P.infl.NONTERM@an I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@anikwacâs-:@P.infl.NA-1@anikwacâs I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@anikwacâs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anikwacâs I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@anohc:@P.infl.IPC@anohc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@anohc:@P.infl.NONTERM@anohc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@anâsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anâsk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@anâskâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anâskâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ap-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ap I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apahkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@apasoy-:@P.infl.NI-2@apasoy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apasoy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apasoy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@api-:@P.infl.NONTERM@api I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@api-:@P.infl.VAI-v@api I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apiht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apiht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apin I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@apis-:@P.infl.IPC@apis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apisc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apisc I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@apiskway-:@P.infl.NA-2@apiskway I2M ;
@P.infl.IPN@apist-:@P.infl.IPN@apist I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apist-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apist I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apisîs:@P.infl.NONTERM@apisîs I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@apoy-:@P.infl.NA-2@apoy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apoy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apoy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@apwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apwê I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@apwê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@apwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@as(i)t-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ast I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@as-:@P.infl.IPC@as I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@as-:@P.infl.IPV@as I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@as-:@P.infl.NONTERM@as I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asam I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@asam-:@P.infl.VTA-1@asam I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@asapâp-:@P.infl.NA-1@asapâp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@asikan-:@P.infl.NA-1@asikan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asikan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asikan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asin I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@asiniy-:@P.infl.NA-2@asiniy I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@asiniy-:@P.infl.NI-2@asiniy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asiniy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asiniy I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@asisiy-:@P.infl.NI-2@asisiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asisk I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@asiskiy-:@P.infl.NI-2@asiskiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asiskiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asiskiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asit I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ask-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ask I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askamik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askamik I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@askatihkway-:@P.infl.NI-2@askatihkway I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@askihkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@askihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askim I2M ;
@P.infl.INM@askiy:@P.infl.INM@askiy I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@askiy:@P.infl.IPC@askiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@askiy:@P.infl.NI-2@askiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askiy:@P.infl.NONTERM@askiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askon-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askon I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@askot-:@P.infl.IPC@askot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askow-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askow I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@askow-:@P.infl.VTA-2@askow I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@askw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askw I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@askôtawiskâ-:@P.infl.VAI-v@askôtawiskâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asot I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@asot-:@P.infl.VTI-1@asot I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asp I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aspastâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aspastâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aspat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aspat I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@aspin:@P.infl.IPC@aspin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aspin:@P.infl.NONTERM@aspin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aspiskwêsimo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aspiskwêsimo I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ast-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ast I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@ast-:@P.infl.VAI-v@ast I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astastw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astastw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astinw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astinw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astinwân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astinwân I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@astis(y)-:@P.infl.NI-2@astis I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@astis-:@P.infl.NA-1@astis I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@astis-:@P.infl.NI-1@astis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astisiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astisiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astostw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astostw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@astotin-:@P.infl.NA-1@astotin I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@astotin-:@P.infl.NI-1@astotin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astotin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astotin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astâkan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@astâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astâw I2M ;
@P.infl.VII-v@astê-:@P.infl.VII-v@astê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aswê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aswê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asâht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâht I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@asâm-:@P.infl.NA-1@asâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asâsw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâsw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@asâwât-:@P.infl.IPC@asâwât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@asê-:@P.infl.IPV@asê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@asê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asê I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@asêsin-:@P.infl.NI-3@asêsin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@at-:@P.infl.NONTERM@at I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atah I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atam I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@atamiskay-:@P.infl.NI-2@atamiskay I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@atihkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@atihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atim I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@atim-:@P.infl.VTA-1@atim I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@atimw-:@P.infl.NA-3@atimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atimw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atis I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@atisw-:@P.infl.VTA-3@atisw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atiw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@atoT-:@P.infl.VTA-4@atoT I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atoh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atoh I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@atos-:@P.infl.NA-1@atos I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@atos-:@P.infl.NI-1@atos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atos I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atosk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atosk I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@atosk-:@P.infl.VAI-v@atosk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atot I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@atâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@atâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atâhkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâm I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@atâm-:@P.infl.VTA-1@atâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atâwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atô(s)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atô I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@atôspiy-:@P.infl.NA-2@atôspiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@atôspo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atôspo I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@atôspo-:@P.infl.VAI-v@atôspo I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@aw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awa-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awa I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awaT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awaT I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@awaT-:@P.infl.VTA-4@awaT I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awahk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awahk I2M ;
@P.infl.IPJ@awahê-:@P.infl.IPJ@awahê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPJ@awas-:@P.infl.IPJ@awas I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awas-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awas I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awih-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awih I2M ;
@P.infl.IPJ@awiyâ:@P.infl.IPJ@awiyâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awâs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awâs I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@awâsis-:@P.infl.NA-1@awâsis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awâsis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awâsis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awên-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awên I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@awîn-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awîn I2M ;
@P.infl.IPJ@ay:@P.infl.IPJ@ay I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@ay-:@P.infl.IPC@ay I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@ay-:@P.infl.NA-2@ay I2M ;
